Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202544-6135
Annual statement; audit.

A mutual insurance holding company shall file with the director, by March 1 of each year, an annual statement consisting of an income statement, balance sheet, and cash flows prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting practices or statutory accounting principles and a confidential statement disclosing any intention to pledge, borrow against, alienate, hypothecate, or in any way encumber the assets of the mutual insurance holding company. A mutual insurance holding company shall also have an annual audit by an independent certified public accountant in a form approved by the director and shall file such audit on or before June 1 of each year for the year ending December 31 immediately preceding.

Laws 1997, LB 740, § 14;

Laws 2025, LB326, § 14.